Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.110

Procedure—Pleadings—Amendment.

The court or judge, if satisfied of the truth of the allegation of sickness or infirmity, may proceed to decide on the return, or the hearing may be adjourned until the party can be produced, or for other good cause. The plaintiff may except to the sufficiency of, or controvert the return or any part thereof, or allege any new matter in evidence. The new matter shall be verified, except in cases of commitment on a criminal charge. The return and pleadings may be amended without causing a delay.

[Code 1881 s 675; 1877 p 139 s 678; 1869 p 157 s 615; 1854 p 213 s 443; RRS s 1073.]